Utah statutes.
20A-11-1202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Ballot proposition" means constitutional amendments, initiatives,
referenda, judicial retention questions, opinion questions, bond approvals, or
other questions submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection.
(2) (a)  "Commercial interlocal cooperation agency" means an interlocal
cooperation agency that receives its revenues from conduct of its commercial
operations.
(b)  "Commercial interlocal cooperation agency" does not mean an interlocal
cooperation agency that receives some or all of its revenues from:
(i)  government appropriations;
(ii)  taxes;
(iii)  government fees imposed for regulatory or revenue raising purposes; or
(iv)  interest earned on public funds or other returns on investment of public
funds.
(3)  "Expenditure" means:
(a)  a purchase, payment, donation, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, gift
of money, or anything of value;
(b)  an express, legally enforceable contract, promise, or agreement to make
any purchase, payment, donation, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, gift of
money, or anything of value;
(c)  a transfer of funds between a public entity and a candidate's personal
campaign committee;
(d)  a transfer of funds between a public entity and a political issues
committee; or
(e)  goods or services provided to or for the benefit of a candidate, a
candidate's personal campaign committee, or a political issues committee for
political purposes at less than fair market value.
(4)  "Governmental interlocal cooperation agency" means an interlocal
cooperation agency that receives some or all of its revenues from:
(a)  government appropriations;
(b)  taxes;
(c)  government fees imposed for regulatory or revenue raising purposes; or
(d)  interest earned on public funds or other returns on investment of public
funds.
(5) (a)  "Influence" means to campaign or advocate for or against a ballot
proposition.
(b)  "Influence" does not mean providing a brief statement about a public
entity's position on a ballot proposition and the reason for that position.
(6)  "Interlocal cooperation agency" means an entity created by interlocal
agreement under the authority of Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation
Act.
(7)  "Local district" means an entity under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local
Government Entities - Local Districts, and includes a special service district
under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.
(8)  "Political purposes" means an act done with the intent or in a way to
influence or intend to influence, directly or indirectly, any person to
refrain from voting or to vote for or against any candidate for public office
at any caucus, political convention, primary, or election.
(9) (a)  "Public entity" includes the state, each state agency, each county,
municipality, school district, local district, governmental interlocal
cooperation agency, and each administrative subunit of each of them.
(b)  "Public entity" does not include a commercial interlocal cooperation
agency.
(c)  "Public entity" includes local health departments created under Title 26,
Chapter 1, Department of Health Organization.
(10) (a)  "Public funds" means any money received by a public entity from
appropriations, taxes, fees, interest, or other returns on investment.
(b)  "Public funds" does not include money donated to a public entity by a
person or entity.
(11) (a)  "Public official" means an elected or appointed member of government
with authority to make or determine public policy.
(b)  "Public official" includes the person or group that:
(i)  has supervisory authority over the personnel and affairs of a public
entity; and
(ii)  approves the expenditure of funds for the public entity.
(12) (a)  "State agency" means each department, commission, board, council,
agency, institution, officer, corporation, fund, division, office, committee,
authority, laboratory, library, unit, bureau, panel, or other administrative
unit of the state.
(b)  "State agency" includes the legislative branch, the Board of Regents, the
institutional councils of each higher education institution, and each higher
education institution.
